Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 1. Generally

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-701.
Purpose.

It is hereby declared that to provide for the conservation of the water resources of the state of Wyoming and for the greatest beneficial use of water within this state, the organization of water conservancy districts and the construction of works as herein defined by such districts are a public use and will:

Be essentially for the public benefit and advantage of the people of the state of Wyoming;

Indirectly benefit all industries of the state;

Indirectly benefit the state of Wyoming in the increase of its taxable property valuation;

Directly benefit municipalities by providing adequate supplies of water for domestic use;

Directly benefit lands to be irrigated or drained from works to be constructed;

Directly benefit lands now under irrigation by stabilizing the flow of water in streams and by increasing flow and return flow of water to such streams;

Promote the comfort, safety and welfare of the people of the state of Wyoming, and it is therefore declared to be the policy of the state of Wyoming:

To control, make use of and apply to beneficial use all unappropriated waters in this state to a direct and supplemental use of such waters for domestic, transportation, industrial, manufacturing, irrigation, power, recreation and other beneficial uses;

To obtain from water in Wyoming the highest duty for domestic uses and irrigation of lands in Wyoming within the terms of interstate compacts;

To cooperate with the United States under the federal reclamation laws or other federal laws now existing, or hereafter enacted, and agencies of the state of Wyoming for the construction and financing of works in the state of Wyoming as herein defined and for the operation and maintenance thereof;

To promote the greater prosperity and general welfare of the people of the state of Wyoming by encouraging the organization of water conservancy districts as provided in this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

].

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-77.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Supplemental”

is defined generally as “servicing, to supply what is lacking; that which is added to a thing to complete it; that which supplies the deficiency or meets a want.” In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

The bringing of water from an outside source is not a necessary requisite to its being supplemental. It could well be that which is conserved by the proper handling of that which has always been there but has been improvidently utilized. In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

Contract relating to disposition of excess lands. —

The provisions of a contract between a water conservancy district and the United States, relating to the disposition of excess lands, were not ultra vires, but on the contrary were within the purposes of this section. In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Water Appropriation for Recreation,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 209 (1966).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 73.

§ 41-3-702.
Short title; definitions.

This act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] may be known and cited as “Water Conservancy Act”; the districts created hereunder may be termed “water conservancy districts”; and the bonds which may be issued hereunder may be called “water conservancy bonds”, and such designation may be engraved or printed on their face. Wherever the term “publication” is used in this act and no manner specified therefor, it shall be taken to mean once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in each county wherein such publication is to be made. It shall not be necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three (3) weeks, but not less than fourteen (14) days (excluding the day of the first publication), shall intervene between the first publication and the last publication, and the publication shall be complete on the date of the last publication.

Whenever the term “person” is used in this act, and not otherwise specified, it shall be taken to mean a person, firm, co-partnership, association or corporation, other than a county, town, city, city and county, or other political subdivision. Similarly, the words “public corporation” shall be taken to mean counties, city and counties, towns, cities, school districts, irrigation districts, water districts, part districts, subdistricts, and all governmental agencies, clothed with the power of levying or providing for the levy of general or special taxes or special assessments.

Whenever the word “board” is used in this act and not otherwise specified, it shall be taken to mean the board of directors of the district.

Whenever the term “works” is used in this act, it shall unless otherwise specified, be held to mean dams, storage reservoirs, compensatory and replacement reservoirs, canals, conduits, pipelines, drains, tunnels, power plants and any and all works, facilities, improvements and property necessary or convenient for the supplying of water for domestic, transportation, industrial, manufacturing, irrigation, power, recreation and other beneficial uses.

Whenever the term “court” is used in this act, and not otherwise specified, it shall be taken to mean the district court of that judicial district of the state of Wyoming wherein the petition for the organization of a water conservancy district shall be filed.

Whenever the term “property” is used in this act, it shall unless otherwise specified, be held to mean real estate and personal property.

Whenever the term “land” or “real estate” is used in this act, it shall unless otherwise specified, be held to mean real estate as the words “real estate” are defined by the laws of the state of Wyoming, and shall embrace all railroads, tramroads, highways, electrical roads, street and interurban railroads, roads, streets, and street improvements, telephone, telegraph, and transmission lines, gas, sewer and water systems, water rights, pipelines and rights-of-way of public service corporations, and all other real property whether held for public or private use.

Whenever the term “land” or “property” is used in this act with reference to benefit, appraisals, assessments, or taxes, public corporations shall as political entities, according to benefits received, be considered as included in such reference in the same manner as “land” or “property”.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-78.

§ 41-3-703.
Effect of improper notice of judicial proceeding.

In any and every case where a notice is provided for in this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], if the court finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the court shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but the court shall in that case order due notice to be given, and shall continue the hearing until such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 41-79.

§ 41-3-704.
Hearings on validity of districts.

All cases in which there may arise a question of the validity of the organization of a water conservancy district, or a question of the validity of any proceeding under this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern, and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 41-80.

§ 41-3-705.
Liberal construction.

This act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, and for the security of public and private property, it shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 41-81.

Severability. —

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 42, reads: “Should the courts of the state or of the United States declare any section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, or part thereof, of this act invalid or unconstitutional, or in conflict with any other section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, or part thereof, of this act, then such decision shall affect only the section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, or part thereof, declared to be unconstitutional or unauthorized; and shall not affect any other part whatsoever of this act. The legislature of the state of Wyoming hereby declares that it would have passed this act and each section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, or phrase hereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more of the other sections, provisions, paragraphs, clauses, sentences or phrases, or parts thereof, be declared invalid or unconstitutional.”